California, session 20252026, AB383.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1524 of the Penal Code, as added by Section 11.5 of Chapter 544 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:1524. (a) A search warrant may be issued upon any of the following grounds:(1) When the property was stolen or embezzled.(2) When the property or things were used as the means of committing a felony.(3) When the property or things are in the possession of a person with the intent to use them as a means of committing a public offense, or in the possession of another to whom that person may have delivered them for the purpose of concealing them or preventing them from being discovered.(4) When the property or things to be seized consist of an item or constitute evidence that tends to show a felony has been committed, or tends to show that a particular person has committed a felony.(5) When the property or things to be seized consist of evidence that tends to show that sexual exploitation of a child, in violation of Section 311.3, or possession of matter depicting sexual conduct of a person under 18 years of age, in violation of Section 311.11, has occurred or is occurring.(6) When there is a warrant to arrest a person.(7) When a provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service has records or evidence, as specified in Section 1524.3, showing that property was stolen or embezzled constituting a misdemeanor, or that property or things are in the possession of a person with the intent to use them as a means of committing a misdemeanor public offense, or in the possession of another to whom that person may have delivered them for the purpose of concealing them or preventing their discovery.(8) When the property or things to be seized include an item or evidence that tends to show a violation of Section 3700.5 of the Labor Code or tends to show that a particular person has violated Section 3700.5 of the Labor Code.(9) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm or other deadly weapon at the scene of, or at the premises occupied or under the control of the person arrested in connection with, a domestic violence incident involving a threat to human life or a physical assault as provided in Section 18250. This section does not affect warrantless seizures otherwise authorized by Section 18250.(10) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm or other deadly weapon that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 8102 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(11) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person who is subject to the prohibitions regarding firearms or ammunition or both pursuant to Section 6389 of the Family Code, if a prohibited firearm or ammunition or both is possessed, owned, in the custody of, or controlled by a person against whom a protective order has been issued pursuant to Section 6218 of the Family Code, the person has been lawfully served with that order, and the person has failed to relinquish the firearm or ammunition or both as required by law.(12) When the information to be received from the use of a tracking device constitutes evidence that tends to show that either a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code has been committed or is being committed, tends to show that a particular person has committed a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code, or is committing a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code, or will assist in locating an individual who has committed or is committing a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code. A tracking device search warrant issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be executed in a manner meeting the requirements specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1534.(13) When a sample of the blood of a person constitutes evidence that tends to show a violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code and the person from whom the sample is being sought has refused an officer’s request to submit to, or has failed to complete, a blood test as required by Section 23612 of the Vehicle Code, and the sample will be drawn from the person in a reasonable, medically approved manner. This paragraph is not intended to abrogate a court’s mandate to determine the propriety of the issuance of a search warrant on a case-by-case basis.(14) Beginning January 1, 2016, the property or things to be seized are firearms or ammunition or both that are owned by, in the possession of, or in the custody or control of a person who is the subject of a gun violence restraining order that has been issued pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6, if a prohibited firearm or ammunition or both is possessed, owned, in the custody of, or controlled by a person against whom a gun violence restraining order has been issued, the person has been lawfully served with that order, and the person has failed to relinquish the firearm as required by law.(15) Beginning January 1, 2018, the property or things to be seized include a firearm that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person who is subject to the prohibitions regarding firearms pursuant to Section 29800, 29805, 29815, 29820, or 29825, and the court has made a finding pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 29810 that the person has failed to relinquish the firearm as required by law.(16) When the property or things to be seized are controlled substances or a device, contrivance, instrument, or paraphernalia used for unlawfully using or administering a controlled substance pursuant to the authority described in Section 11472 of the Health and Safety Code.(17) (A) When all of the following apply:(i) A sample of the blood of a person constitutes evidence that tends to show a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.(ii) The person from whom the sample is being sought has refused an officer’s request to submit to, or has failed to complete, a blood test as required by Section 655.1 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.(iii) The sample will be drawn from the person in a reasonable, medically approved manner.(B) This paragraph is not intended to abrogate a court’s mandate to determine the propriety of the issuance of a search warrant on a case-by-case basis.(18) When the property or things to be seized consists of evidence that tends to show that a violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 647 has occurred or is occurring.(19) (A) When the property or things to be seized are data, from a recording device installed by the manufacturer of a motor vehicle, that constitutes evidence that tends to show the commission of a felony or misdemeanor offense involving a motor vehicle, resulting in death or serious bodily injury to a person. The data accessed by a warrant pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed the scope of the data that is directly related to the offense for which the warrant is issued.(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “recording device” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 9951 of the Vehicle Code. The scope of the data accessible by a warrant issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to the information described in subdivision (b) of Section 9951 of the Vehicle Code.(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.(20) When the property or things to be seized consists of evidence that tends to show that a violation of Section 647.9 has occurred or is occurring. Evidence to be seized pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to evidence of a violation of Section 647.9 and shall not include evidence of a violation of a departmental rule or guideline that is not a public offense under California law.(21) If the property to be seized includes ammunition and all of the following criteria are satisfied:(A) The property is owned by, in the possession of, or in the custody or control of a person who is subject to the prohibition set forth in Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(B) The person has been lawfully served with the order required by Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(C) The person has failed to relinquish the ammunition as required by law.(22) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm or ammunition or both that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person who is subject to the prohibitions regarding firearms pursuant to Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the person has been lawfully served with that order, and the person has failed to relinquish the firearm or ammunition or both as required by law.(b) The property, things, person, or persons described in subdivision (a) may be taken on the warrant from a place or from a person in whose possession the property or things may be.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), a search warrant shall not be issued for documentary evidence in the possession or under the control of a person who is a lawyer as defined in Section 950 of the Evidence Code, a physician as defined in Section 990 of the Evidence Code, a psychotherapist as defined in Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, or a member of the clergy as defined in Section 1030 of the Evidence Code, and who is not reasonably suspected of engaging or having engaged in criminal activity related to the documentary evidence for which a warrant is requested unless the following procedure has been complied with:(1) At the time of the issuance of the warrant, the court shall appoint a special master in accordance with subdivision (d) to accompany the person who will serve the warrant. Upon service of the warrant, the special master shall inform the party served of the specific items being sought and that the party shall have the opportunity to provide the items requested. If the party, in the judgment of the special master, fails to provide the items requested, the special master shall conduct a search for the items in the areas indicated in the search warrant.(2) (A) If the party who has been served states that an item or items should not be disclosed, they shall be sealed by the special master and taken to court for a hearing.(B) At the hearing, the party searched shall be entitled to raise an issue that may be raised pursuant to Section 1538.5 as well as a claim that the item or items are privileged, as provided by law. The hearing shall be held in the superior court. The court shall provide sufficient time for the parties to obtain counsel and make motions or present evidence. The hearing shall be held within three days of the service of the warrant unless the court makes a finding that the expedited hearing is impracticable. In that case, the matter shall be heard at the earliest possible time.(C) If an item or items are taken to court for a hearing, a limitation of time prescribed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 799) of Title 3 shall be tolled from the time of the seizure until the final conclusion of the hearing, including an associated writ or appellate proceedings.(3) The warrant shall, whenever practicable, be served during normal business hours. In addition, the warrant shall be served upon a party who appears to have possession or control of the items sought. If, after reasonable efforts, the party serving the warrant is unable to locate the person, the special master shall seal and return to the court, for determination by the court, an item that appears to be privileged as provided by law.(d) (1) As used in this section, a “special master” is an attorney who is a member in good standing of the California State Bar and who has been selected from a list of qualified attorneys that is maintained by the State Bar particularly for the purposes of conducting the searches described in this section. These attorneys shall serve without compensation. A special master shall be considered a public employee, and the governmental entity that caused the search warrant to be issued shall be considered the employer of the special master and the applicable public entity, for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, relating to claims and actions against public entities and public employees. In selecting the special master, the court shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that the person selected has no relationship with any of the parties involved in the pending matter. Information obtained by the special master shall be confidential and may not be divulged except in direct response to inquiry by the court.(2) In a case in which the magistrate determines that, after reasonable efforts have been made to obtain a special master, a special master is not available and would not be available within a reasonable period of time, the magistrate may direct the party seeking the order to conduct the search in the manner described in this section in lieu of the special master.(e) A search conducted pursuant to this section by a special master may be conducted in a manner that permits the party serving the warrant or that party’s designee to accompany the special master as the special master conducts the search. However, that party or that party’s designee may not participate in the search nor shall they examine any of the items being searched by the special master except upon agreement of the party upon whom the warrant has been served.(f) As used in this section, “documentary evidence” includes, but is not limited to, writings, documents, blueprints, drawings, photographs, computer printouts, microfilms, x-rays, files, diagrams, ledgers, books, tapes, audio and video recordings, films, and papers of any type or description.(g) No warrant shall issue for an item or items described in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code.(h) No warrant shall issue for an item or items that pertain to an investigation into a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.(i) Notwithstanding any other law, no claim of attorney work product as described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2018.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be sustained where there is probable cause to believe that the lawyer is engaging or has engaged in criminal activity related to the documentary evidence for which a warrant is requested unless it is established at the hearing with respect to the documentary evidence seized under the warrant that the services of the lawyer were not sought or obtained to enable or aid anyone to commit or plan to commit a crime or a fraud.(j) Nothing in this section is intended to limit an attorney’s ability to request an in-camera hearing pursuant to the holding of the Supreme Court of California in People v. Superior Court (Laff) (2001) 25 Cal.4th 703.(k) In addition to any other circumstance permitting a magistrate to issue a warrant for a person or property in another county, when the property or things to be seized consist of any item or constitute evidence that tends to show a violation of Section 530.5, the magistrate may issue a warrant to search a person or property located in another county if the person whose identifying information was taken or used resides in the same county as the issuing court.(l) This section does not create a cause of action against a foreign or California corporation, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons for providing location information.(m) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.SEC. 2. Section 29615 of the Penal Code is amended to read:29615. Section 29610 shall not apply if one of the following circumstances exists:(a) The minor is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves this use of a firearm.(b) The minor is accompanied by a responsible adult, the minor has the prior written consent of a parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.(c) The minor is at least 16 years of age, the minor has the prior written consent of a parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.(d) The minor has the prior written consent of a parent or legal guardian, the minor is on lands owned or lawfully possessed by the parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.(e) The minor possesses, with the express permission of their parent or legal guardian, a firearm, other than a handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle, and both of the following are true:(1) The minor is actively engaged in, or in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or an agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.(2) The minor is 16 years of age or older or is accompanied by a responsible adult at all times while the minor is possessing the firearm.SEC. 3. Section 29810 of the Penal Code, as added by Section 28 of Chapter 544 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:29810. (a) (1) Upon conviction of, or adjudication for, any offense that renders a person subject to Section 29800, 29805, 29815, 29820, or 29825, the person shall relinquish all firearms they own, possess, or have under their custody or control in the manner provided in this section within 48 hours of the conviction or adjudication if the person remains out of custody or within 14 days of the conviction or adjudication if the person is in custody.(2) The court shall, upon conviction or adjudication of a person for an offense described in subdivision (a), instruct the person that they are prohibited from owning, purchasing, receiving, possessing, or having under their custody or control, any firearms, ammunition, and ammunition feeding devices, including, but not limited to, magazines, and shall order the person to relinquish all firearms in the manner provided in this section. The court shall also provide the person with a Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form developed by the Department of Justice.(3) Using the Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form, the person shall name a designee and grant the designee power of attorney for the purpose of transferring or disposing of any firearms. The designee shall be either a local law enforcement agency or a consenting third party who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The designee shall, within the time periods specified in subdivisions (d) and (e), surrender the firearms to the control of a local law enforcement agency, sell the firearms to a licensed firearms dealer, or transfer the firearms for storage to a firearms dealer pursuant to Section 29830.(b) The Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form shall do all of the following:(1) Inform the person that they are prohibited from owning, purchasing, receiving, possessing, or having under their custody or control, any firearms, ammunition, and, if applicable, ammunition feeding devices, including, but not limited to, magazines, and that they shall relinquish all firearms through a designee within the time periods set forth in subdivision (d) or (e) by surrendering the firearms to the control of a local law enforcement agency, selling the firearms to a licensed firearms dealer, or transferring the firearms for storage to a firearms dealer pursuant to Section 29830.(2) Inform the person that any cohabitant of the person who owns firearms must store those firearms in accordance with Section 25135.(3) Require the person to declare any firearms that they owned, possessed, or had under their custody or control at the time of their conviction or adjudication, and require the person to describe the firearms and provide all reasonably available information about the location of the firearms to enable a designee or law enforcement officials to locate the firearms.(4) Require the person to name a designee, if the person declares that they owned, possessed, or had under their custody or control any firearms at the time of their conviction or adjudication, and grant the designee power of attorney for the purpose of transferring or disposing of all firearms.(5) Require the designee to indicate their consent to the designation and, except a designee that is a law enforcement agency, to declare under penalty of perjury that they are not prohibited from possessing any firearms under state or federal law.(6) Require the designee to state the date each firearm was relinquished and the name of the party to whom it was relinquished, and to attach receipts from the law enforcement officer or licensed firearms dealer who took possession of the relinquished firearms.(7) Inform the person and the designee of the obligation to submit the completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form to the assigned probation officer within the time periods specified in subdivisions (d) and (e).(c) (1) When a person is convicted of, or adjudicated for, an offense described in subdivision (a), the court shall immediately assign the matter to a probation officer to investigate whether the Automated Firearms System or other credible information, such as a police report, reveals that the person owns, possesses, or has under their custody or control any firearms. The assigned probation officer shall receive the Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form from the person or the person’s designee, as applicable, and ensure that the Automated Firearms System has been properly updated to indicate that the person has relinquished those firearms.(2) Prior to final disposition or sentencing in the case, the assigned probation officer shall report to the court and the prosecuting attorney whether the person has properly complied with the requirements of this section by relinquishing all firearms identified by the probation officer’s investigation or declared by the person on the Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form, and by timely submitting a completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form. The probation officer shall also report to the Department of Justice on a form to be developed by the department whether the Automated Firearms System has been updated to indicate which firearms have been relinquished by the person.(3) If the report of the probation officer does not confirm relinquishment of firearms the court shall take one of the following actions:(A) If the court finds probable cause, after a warrant request has been submitted pursuant to Section 1524, that the person has failed to relinquish any firearms as required, the court shall order a search warrant for, and removal of, any firearms at any location where the judge has probable cause to believe the person’s firearms are located. The court shall set a court date to confirm relinquishment of all firearms. The search warrant shall be executed within 10 days pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1534.(B) If the court finds good cause to extend the time for providing proof of relinquishment, the court shall set a court date within 14 days for the person to provide proof of relinquishment.(C) If the court finds additional investigation is needed, the court shall refer the matter to the prosecuting attorney and set a court date within 14 days for status review.(4) Prior to final disposition or sentencing in the case, the court shall confirm that the person has relinquished all firearms as required, and that the court has received a completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form, along with the receipts described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). The court shall ensure that these findings are included in the abstract of judgment. If necessary to avoid a delay in sentencing, the court may make and enter these findings within 14 days of sentencing.(5) Failure by a person to timely file the completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form with the assigned probation officer shall constitute an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).(d) The following procedures shall apply to any person who is a prohibited person within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) who does not remain in custody at any time within the 48-hour period following conviction or adjudication:(1) The designee shall dispose of any firearms the person owns, possesses, or has under their custody or control within 48 hours of the conviction or adjudication by surrendering the firearms to the control of a local law enforcement agency, selling the firearms to a licensed firearms dealer, or transferring the firearms for storage to a firearms dealer pursuant to Section 29830, in accordance with the wishes of the person. Any proceeds from the sale of the firearms shall become the property of the person. The law enforcement officer or licensed dealer taking possession of any firearms pursuant to this subdivision shall issue a receipt to the designee describing the firearms and listing any serial number or other identification on the firearms at the time of surrender.(2) If the person owns, possesses, or has under their custody or control any firearms to relinquish, the person’s designee shall submit the completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form to the assigned probation officer within 48 hours following the conviction or adjudication, along with the receipts described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) showing the person’s firearms were surrendered to a local law enforcement agency or sold or transferred to a licensed firearms dealer.(3) If the person does not own, possess, or have under their custody or control any firearms to relinquish, they shall, within 48 hours following conviction or adjudication, submit the completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form to the assigned probation officer, with a statement affirming that they have no firearms to be relinquished.(e) The following procedures shall apply to any person who is a prohibited person within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) who is in custody at any point within the 48-hour period following conviction or adjudication:(1) The designee shall dispose of any firearms the person owns, possesses, or has under their custody or control within 14 days of the conviction or adjudication by surrendering the firearms to the control of a local law enforcement agency, selling the firearms to a licensed firearms dealer, or transferring the firearms for storage to a firearms dealer pursuant to Section 29830, in accordance with the wishes of the person. Any proceeds from the sale of the firearms shall become the property of the person. The law enforcement officer or licensed dealer taking possession of any firearms pursuant to this subdivision shall issue a receipt to the designee describing the firearms and listing any serial number or other identification on the firearms at the time of surrender.(2) If the person owns, possesses, or has under their custody or control any firearms to relinquish, the person’s designee shall submit the completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form to the assigned probation officer, within 14 days following conviction or adjudication, along with the receipts described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) showing the person’s firearms were surrendered to a local law enforcement agency or sold or transferred to a licensed firearms dealer.(3) If the person does not own, possess, or have under their custody or control any firearms to relinquish, they shall, within 14 days following conviction or adjudication, submit the completed Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form to the assigned probation officer, with a statement affirming that they have no firearms to be relinquished.(4) If the person is released from custody during the 14 days following conviction or adjudication and a designee has not yet taken temporary possession of each firearm to be relinquished as described above, the person shall, within 5 days following their release, relinquish each firearm required to be relinquished pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).(f) For good cause, the court may shorten or enlarge the time periods specified in subdivisions (d) and (e), enlarge the time period specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), or allow an alternative method of relinquishment.(g) The person shall not be subject to prosecution for unlawful possession of any firearms declared on the Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form if the firearms are relinquished as required.(h) Any firearms that would otherwise be subject to relinquishment by a person under this section, but which are lawfully owned by a cohabitant of the person, shall be exempt from relinquishment, provided the person is notified that the cohabitant must store the firearm in accordance with Section 25135.(i) A law enforcement agency shall update the Automated Firearms System to reflect any firearms that were relinquished to the agency pursuant to this section. A law enforcement agency shall retain a firearm that was relinquished to the agency pursuant to this section for 30 days after the date the firearm was relinquished. After the 30-day period has expired, the firearm is subject to destruction, retention, or other transfer by the agency, except upon the certificate of a judge of a court of record, or of the district attorney of the county, that the retention of the firearm is necessary or proper to the ends of justice, or if the person provides written notice of an intent to appeal a conviction or adjudication for an offense described in subdivision (a), or if the Automated Firearms System indicates that the firearm was reported lost or stolen by the lawful owner. If the firearm was reported lost or stolen, the firearm shall be restored to the lawful owner, as soon as its use as evidence has been served, upon the lawful owner’s identification of the weapon and proof of ownership, and after the law enforcement agency has complied with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4. The agency shall notify the Department of Justice of the disposition of relinquished firearms pursuant to Section 34010.(j) A city, county, or city and county, or a state agency may adopt a regulation, ordinance, or resolution imposing a charge equal to its administrative costs relating to the seizure, impounding, storage, or release of a firearm pursuant to Section 33880.(k) If a person declines to relinquish possession of a firearm or ammunition based on the assertion of the right against self-incrimination, as provided by the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 15 of Article I of the California Constitution, the court may grant use immunity for the act of relinquishing the firearm or ammunition required under this section.(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.SEC. 4. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.